Wisconsin, session 2025, AB181.
do enact as follows:AB181,11Section 1. 28.11 (5m) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 28.11 (5m) (a) 2. and 2amended to read:AB181,2,6328.11 (5m) (a) 2. The department may make grants, from the appropriation 4under s. 20.370 (5) (bw), to counties having lands entered under sub. (4) to fund all 5of the following for one professional forester in the position of county forest 6administrator or assistant county forest administrator:AB181,2,77a. Up to 50 percent of the forester’s county forest administrator’s salary.AB181,2,108b. Up to 50 percent of the forester’s county forest administrator’s fringe 9benefits, except that the fringe benefits may not exceed 40 percent of the forester’s 10county forest administrator’s salary.AB181,211Section 2. 28.11 (5m) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:AB181,2,151228.11 (5m) (a) 1. In this paragraph, “county forest administrator” means an 13individual who is employed to manage a county forest program under s. 28.10 and 14this section and who has any of the following qualifications, except that it does not 15include an individual who is employed by the department: AB181,2,1816a. A bachelor’s or higher degree in forestry from a school of forestry with a 17curriculum accredited by the Society of American Foresters or an equivalent 18degree, as determined by the chief state forester.AB181,3,219b. A bachelor’s or higher degree in natural resources, conservation, or wildlife 1and 3 or more years of experience managing a county forest program under s. 28.10 2and this section.AB181,3,43c. An associate degree in forestry and 3 or more years of experience managing 4a county forest program under s. 28.10 and this section.AB181,35Section 3. Initial applicability.AB181,3,76(1) This act first applies to an application for a grant under s. 28.11 (5m) (a) 2. 7submitted on the effective date of this subsection.AB181,48Section 4. Effective date.AB181,3,99(1) This act takes effect retroactive to January 1, 2025.AB181,3,1010